Texas, session 892, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 26.013, Tax Code, is amended by adding Subsection (c) to read as follows: (c)  This subsection applies only to a junior college district, a hospital district, or a taxing unit, other than a school district, for which the maintenance and operations tax rate proposed for the current tax year is 2.5 cents or less per $100 of taxable value. Notwithstanding Subsection (b)(2), for each tax year before the 2026 tax year, the foregone revenue amount of a taxing unit to which this subsection applies is considered to be zero. This subsection expires December 31, 2028. SECTION 2.  Section 26.04(c), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  After the assessor for the taxing unit submits the appraisal roll for the taxing unit to the governing body of the taxing unit as required by Subsection (b), an officer or employee designated by the governing body shall calculate the no-new-revenue tax rate and the voter-approval tax rate for the taxing unit, where: (1)  "No-new-revenue tax rate" means a rate expressed in dollars per $100 of taxable value calculated according to the following formula: NO-NEW-REVENUE TAX RATE = (LAST YEAR'S LEVY - LOST PROPERTY LEVY) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE) ; and (2)  "Voter-approval tax rate" means a rate expressed in dollars per $100 of taxable value calculated according to the following [applicable] formula: [(A)  for a special taxing unit: [VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE x 1.08) + CURRENT DEBT RATE [; or [(B)  for a taxing unit other than a special taxing unit:] VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE x 1.025 [1.035]) + (CURRENT DEBT RATE + UNUSED INCREMENT RATE) SECTION 3.  Sections 26.041(a), (b), and (c), Tax Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  In the first year in which an additional sales and use tax is required to be collected, the no-new-revenue tax rate and voter-approval tax rate for the taxing unit are calculated according to the following formulas: NO-NEW-REVENUE TAX RATE = [(LAST YEAR'S LEVY - LOST PROPERTY LEVY) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] - SALES TAX GAIN RATE and [VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE FOR SPECIAL TAXING UNIT = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE x 1.08) + (CURRENT DEBT RATE - SALES TAX GAIN RATE) [or] VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE [FOR TAXING UNIT OTHER THAN SPECIAL TAXING UNIT] = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE x 1.025 [1.035]) + (CURRENT DEBT RATE + UNUSED INCREMENT RATE - SALES TAX GAIN RATE) where "sales tax gain rate" means a number expressed in dollars per $100 of taxable value, calculated by dividing the revenue that will be generated by the additional sales and use tax in the following year as calculated under Subsection (d) by the current total value. (b)  Except as provided by Subsections (a) and (c), in a year in which a taxing unit imposes an additional sales and use tax, the voter-approval tax rate for the taxing unit is calculated according to the following formula, regardless of whether the taxing unit levied a property tax in the preceding year: [VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE FOR SPECIAL TAXING UNIT = [(LAST YEAR'S MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS EXPENSE x 1.08) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] + (CURRENT DEBT RATE - SALES TAX REVENUE RATE) [or] VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE [FOR TAXING UNIT OTHER THAN SPECIAL TAXING UNIT] = [(LAST YEAR'S MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS EXPENSE x 1.025 [1.035]) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] + (CURRENT DEBT RATE + UNUSED INCREMENT RATE - SALES TAX REVENUE RATE) where "last year's maintenance and operations expense" means the amount spent for maintenance and operations from property tax and additional sales and use tax revenues in the preceding year, and "sales tax revenue rate" means a number expressed in dollars per $100 of taxable value, calculated by dividing the revenue that will be generated by the additional sales and use tax in the current year as calculated under Subsection (d) by the current total value. (c)  In a year in which a taxing unit that has been imposing an additional sales and use tax ceases to impose an additional sales and use tax, the no-new-revenue tax rate and voter-approval tax rate for the taxing unit are calculated according to the following formulas: NO-NEW-REVENUE TAX RATE = [(LAST YEAR'S LEVY - LOST PROPERTY LEVY) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] + SALES TAX LOSS RATE and [VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE FOR SPECIAL TAXING UNIT = [(LAST YEAR'S MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS EXPENSE x 1.08) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] + CURRENT DEBT RATE [or] VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE [FOR TAXING UNIT OTHER THAN SPECIAL TAXING UNIT] = [(LAST YEAR'S MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS EXPENSE x 1.025 [1.035]) / (CURRENT TOTAL VALUE - NEW PROPERTY VALUE)] + (CURRENT DEBT RATE + UNUSED INCREMENT RATE) where "sales tax loss rate" means a number expressed in dollars per $100 of taxable value, calculated by dividing the amount of sales and use tax revenue generated in the last four quarters for which the information is available by the current total value and "last year's maintenance and operations expense" means the amount spent for maintenance and operations from property tax and additional sales and use tax revenues in the preceding year. SECTION 4.  Section 26.042(a), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 30, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Notwithstanding Sections 26.04 and 26.041, the governing body of a taxing unit other than a school district [or a special taxing unit] may direct the designated officer or employee to calculate the voter-approval tax rate of the taxing unit in the manner provided by Subsection (a-2) if any part of the taxing unit is located in an area declared a disaster area during the current tax year by the governor or by the president of the United States and at least one person is granted an exemption under Section 11.35 for property located in the taxing unit. The designated officer or employee shall continue calculating the voter-approval tax rate in the manner provided by this subsection until the earlier of: (1)  the first tax year in which the total taxable value of property taxable by the taxing unit as shown on the appraisal roll for the taxing unit submitted by the assessor for the taxing unit to the governing body exceeds the total taxable value of property taxable by the taxing unit on January 1 of the tax year in which the disaster occurred; or (2)  the third tax year after the tax year in which the disaster occurred. SECTION 5.  Section 26.042(a-2), Tax Code, as added by H.B. 30, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is amended to read as follows: (a-2)  The voter-approval tax rate the governing body of the taxing unit may direct the designated officer or employee to calculate under Subsection (a) is equal to the lesser of: (1)  the voter-approval tax rate calculated according to the following formula: VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE X 1.08) + CURRENT DEBT RATE [in the manner provided for a special taxing unit] ; or (2)  the voter-approval tax rate calculated according to the following formula: VOTER-APPROVAL TAX RATE = (NO-NEW-REVENUE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS RATE X 1.025 [1.035]) + (CURRENT DEBT RATE + UNUSED INCREMENT RATE + DISASTER RELIEF RATE) SECTION 6.  Section 26.042(c), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  For purposes of Subsection (b), "adjusted voter-approval tax rate" means the voter-approval tax rate a taxing unit would have calculated in the last year for which Subsection (a) applied to the taxing unit if in each tax year Subsection (a) applied to the taxing unit the taxing unit adopted a tax rate equal to the greater of: (1)  the tax rate actually adopted by the taxing unit for that tax year, if that tax rate was approved by the voters at an election held under Section 26.07; or (2)  the taxing unit's voter-approval tax rate for that tax year, calculated in the manner provided by Section 26.04 [for a taxing unit other than a special taxing unit]. SECTION 7.  Section 26.063(a), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to a taxing unit: (1)  other than [that is: [(A)  a taxing unit other than a special taxing unit; or [(B)]  a municipality with a population of [less than] 30,000 or more [, regardless of whether it is a special taxing unit]; (2)  that is required to provide notice under Section 26.06(b-1) or (b-3); and (3)  for which the de minimis rate exceeds the voter-approval tax rate. SECTION 8.  Section 26.07(b), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  If the governing body of a [special taxing unit or a] municipality with a population of 30,000 or more adopts a tax rate that exceeds the taxing unit's voter-approval tax rate, or the governing body of a taxing unit other than a [special taxing unit or a] municipality with a population of [less than] 30,000 or more [regardless of whether it is a special taxing unit] adopts a tax rate that exceeds the greater of the taxing unit's voter-approval tax rate or de minimis rate, the registered voters of the taxing unit at an election held for that purpose must determine whether to approve the adopted tax rate. SECTION 9.  Sections 26.075(a) and (b), Tax Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to a taxing unit other than: (1)  [a special taxing unit; [(2)]  a school district; or (2) [(3)]  a municipality with a population of 30,000 or more. (b)  This section applies to a taxing unit only in a tax year in which the taxing unit's: (1)  de minimis rate exceeds the taxing unit's voter-approval tax rate; and (2)  adopted tax rate is: (A)  equal to or lower than the taxing unit's de minimis rate; and (B)  greater than the [greater of the] taxing unit's[: [(i)]  voter-approval tax rate [calculated as if the taxing unit were a special taxing unit; or [(ii)  voter-approval tax rate]. SECTION 10.  Section 49.057, Water Code, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsection (j) to read as follows: (b)  The board shall adopt an annual budget.  The board of a developed district[, as defined by Section 49.23602,] shall include as an appendix to the budget the district's: (1)  audited financial statements; (2)  bond transcripts; and (3)  engineer's reports required by Section 49.106. (j)  In this section, "developed district" means a district that has financed, completed, and issued bonds to pay for all land, works, improvements, facilities, plants, equipment, and appliances necessary to serve at least 95 percent of the projected build-out of the district in accordance with the purposes for its creation or the purposes authorized by the constitution, this code, or any other law. SECTION 11.  Section 49.236(a), Water Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Before the board adopts an ad valorem tax rate for the district for debt service, operation and maintenance purposes, or contract purposes, the board shall give notice of each meeting of the board at which the adoption of a tax rate will be considered. The notice must: (1)  contain a statement in substantially the following form: "NOTICE OF PUBLIC HEARING ON TAX RATE "The (name of the district) will hold a public hearing on a proposed tax rate for the tax year (year of tax levy) on (date and time) at (meeting place). Your individual taxes may increase at a greater or lesser rate, or even decrease, depending on the tax rate that is adopted and on the change in the taxable value of your property in relation to the change in taxable value of all other property. The change in the taxable value of your property in relation to the change in the taxable value of all other property determines the distribution of the tax burden among all property owners. "Visit Texas.gov/PropertyTaxes to find a link to your local property tax database on which you can easily access information regarding your property taxes, including information about proposed tax rates and scheduled public hearings of each entity that taxes your property. "(Names of all board members and, if a vote was taken, an indication of how each voted on the proposed tax rate and an indication of any absences.)"; (2)  contain the following information: (A)  the district's total adopted tax rate for the preceding year and the proposed tax rate, expressed as an amount per $100; (B)  the difference, expressed as an amount per $100 and as a percent increase or decrease, as applicable, in the proposed tax rate compared to the adopted tax rate for the preceding year; (C)  the average appraised value of a residence homestead in the district in the preceding year and in the current year; the district's total homestead exemption, other than an exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older, applicable to that appraised value in each of those years; and the average taxable value of a residence homestead in the district in each of those years, disregarding any homestead exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older; (D)  the amount of tax that would have been imposed by the district in the preceding year on a residence homestead appraised at the average appraised value of a residence homestead in that year, disregarding any homestead exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older; (E)  the amount of tax that would be imposed by the district in the current year on a residence homestead appraised at the average appraised value of a residence homestead in that year, disregarding any homestead exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older, if the proposed tax rate is adopted; (F)  the difference between the amounts of tax calculated under Paragraphs (D) and (E), expressed in dollars and cents and described as the annual percentage increase or decrease, as applicable, in the tax to be imposed by the district on the average residence homestead in the district in the current year if the proposed tax rate is adopted; and (G)  if the proposed combined debt service, operation and maintenance, and contract tax rate requires [or authorizes] an election to approve [or reduce] the tax rate, [as applicable,] a description of the purpose of the proposed tax increase; (3)  contain a statement in substantially the following form[, as applicable: [(A)  if the district is a district described by Section 49.23601]: "NOTICE OF VOTE ON TAX RATE "If the district adopts a combined debt service, operation and maintenance, and contract tax rate that would result in the taxes on the average residence homestead increasing by more than 2.5 [eight] percent, an election must be held to determine whether to approve the operation and maintenance tax rate under Section 49.23601, Water Code."; [(B)  if the district is a district described by Section 49.23602: ["NOTICE OF VOTE ON TAX RATE ["If the district adopts a combined debt service, operation and maintenance, and contract tax rate that would result in the taxes on the average residence homestead increasing by more than 3.5 percent, an election must be held to determine whether to approve the operation and maintenance tax rate under Section 49.23602, Water Code."; or [(C)  if the district is a district described by Section 49.23603: ["NOTICE OF TAXPAYERS' RIGHT TO ELECTION TO REDUCE TAX RATE ["If the district adopts a combined debt service, operation and maintenance, and contract tax rate that would result in the taxes on the average residence homestead increasing by more than eight percent, the qualified voters of the district by petition may require that an election be held to determine whether to reduce the operation and maintenance tax rate to the voter-approval tax rate under Section 49.23603, Water Code.";] and (4)  include the following statement: "The 86th Texas Legislature modified the manner in which the voter-approval tax rate is calculated to limit the rate of growth of property taxes in the state.". SECTION 12.  The heading to Section 49.23601, Water Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 49.23601.  AUTOMATIC ELECTION TO APPROVE TAX RATE [FOR LOW TAX RATE DISTRICTS]. SECTION 13.  Sections 49.23601(a) and (c), Water Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  In this section, "voter-approval tax rate" means the rate equal to the sum of the following tax rates for the district: (1)  the current year's debt service tax rate; (2)  the current year's contract tax rate; and (3)  the operation and maintenance tax rate that would impose 1.025 [1.08] times the amount of [the] operation and maintenance tax imposed by the district in the preceding year on a residence homestead appraised at the average appraised value of a residence homestead in the district in that year, disregarding any homestead exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older. (c)  If the board of a district adopts a combined debt service, contract, and operation and maintenance tax rate that would impose more than 1.025 [1.08] times the amount of tax imposed by the district in the preceding year on a residence homestead appraised at the average appraised value of a residence homestead in the district in that year, disregarding any homestead exemption available only to disabled persons or persons 65 years of age or older, an election must be held in accordance with the procedures provided by Sections 26.07(c)-(g), Tax Code, to determine whether to approve the adopted tax rate.  If the adopted tax rate is not approved at the election, the district's tax rate is the voter-approval tax rate. SECTION 14.  The following provisions are repealed: (1)  Section 26.012(19), Tax Code; (2)  Section 49.23601(b), Water Code; (3)  Section 49.23602, Water Code; and (4)  Section 49.23603, Water Code. SECTION 15.  This Act applies only to ad valorem taxes imposed for an ad valorem tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 16.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.